Massachusetts, session 194th, H4423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 18 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2B the following 2 sections:
Section 2C. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
“Department”, the department of transitional assistance.
“Food security job”, any financially compensated work involving food production, food
distribution, food preparation, or food delivery for food insecure Massachusetts residents.
“Nonprofit food security organization”, an organization that is exempt from taxation
under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and that has programs which: (1) provide land
to low- and moderate-income individuals for agricultural production; or (2) has programs which
provide food security jobs to low- and moderate-income individuals, including, but not limited
to, food production jobs, food distribution jobs, food preparation jobs, and food delivery jobs.
of 4

“Overburdened community” means a census block group in Massachusetts that meets the
following criteria:
(1) Is at or above the 75th statewide percentile for at least 2 of the following
environmental indicators on the most recent available United States Environmental Protection
Agency’s EJSCREEN assessment: (a) PM 2.5; (b) ozone; (c) NATA diesel PM; (d) NATA
cancer risk; (e) NATA respiratory hazard index; (f) traffic proximity; (g) lead paint indicator; (h)
superfund proximity; (i) risk management plan facilities proximity; (j) hazardous waste
proximity; and (k) wastewater discharge indicator; and
(2) has a median household income that is no greater than 80% of the statewide median
household income as calculated by the US Census Bureau.
(b) The department shall create the food justice frontline program.
(c) The food justice frontline program shall fund nonprofit food security organizations for
the purpose of creating and sustaining food security jobs to individuals living within
overburdened communities.
(d) The department shall create an application with which nonprofit food security
organizations may apply to receive a financial grant, not to exceed $500,000.
(e) In order to be eligible for the food justice frontline program, the nonprofit food
security organization must submit an application that includes, but is not necessarily limited to:
(1) a detailed description of the program or programs which the nonprofit food security
organization operates that provide land or food security jobs to low-income Massachusetts
residents; and (2) a detailed description of the ways in which the nonprofit food security
of 4

organization would use funding to create jobs for individuals living within overburdened
communities.
(f) The department shall establish regulations and guidelines regarding the process and
criteria for approval of applications for the food justice frontline program. These regulations and
guidelines shall prioritize applications from nonprofit food security organizations which
demonstrate a clear and credible plan to quickly create food security jobs for individuals living
within overburdened communities.
(g) Nonprofit food security organizations which receive a grant under the food justice
frontline program must use the entirety of the grant money on programs which will create food
security jobs for individuals living within overburdened communities. These jobs must pay an
hourly wage of not less than the quotient of one divided by two thousand and four hundred
(1/2,400), multiplied by the statewide per capita income, as calculated by the United States
Census Bureau.
(h) A nonprofit food security organization may apply for multiple financial grants under
the food justice frontline program.
(i) The department shall have the power to enter contracts, hire employees, hire
contractors, promulgate rules and regulations, adjudicate administrative cases, or take any other
lawful action in order to implement the food justice frontline program.
Section 2D. (a) The department, in consultation with the executive office of economic
development and the executive office of housing and liveable communities, shall establish a
program designed to increase public awareness of the availability of the supplemental nutrition
assistance program, the healthy incentives program, and other similar food access programs for
of 4

low-income Massachusetts residents and food insecure Massachusetts residents.The department
shall employ Massachusetts residents under the age of eighteen to promote public awareness of
the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The department shall prioritize working with
Massachusetts residents who live in overburdened communities or census block groups with a
median household income that is below 80% of the statewide median household income. This
program shall be conducted in languages which reflect the native languages spoken by members
of relevant overburdened communities.
(b) The department may apply for any relevant federal programs administered by the
United States department of agriculture to provide matching benefits to be deposited in the fund.
(c) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this program.
of 4